Hawaii, session 2026, HB2607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 482P-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1.  By adding two new definitions to be appropriately inserted and to read: ""Artificial intelligence" has the same meaning as defined in section 11-303. "Artificial intelligence deepfake" means any image, audio, video, or other media that: (1)  Is entirely created using artificial intelligence and would falsely appear to a reasonable person to be authentic; or (2)  Is materially altered by artificial intelligence and the alteration would cause a reasonable person to have a fundamentally different understanding of the altered media when comparing it to an unaltered version." 2. By amending the definition of "likeness" to read: ""Likeness" means an image, photograph, painting, sketching, model, diagram, artificial intelligence deepfake, or other recognizable representation of an individual's face or body, and includes, in the case of a personality, a characteristic." SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________